New York, session 2025-2026, A11112.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1110 of the public health law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. The department, in consultation with the commissioner of education, 4 shall create and issue a five-year plan with its proposals to mitigate 5 the presence of lead in school water across the state, including spec- 6 ification of any improvements to lead testing accuracy, improvements to 7 verifying that remediation has occurred before an outlet is returned to 8 service, and the development of standardized criteria and reporting 9 requirements to distinguish between outlets that have been remediated 10 through repair, replacement, or other corrective action and outlets that 11 have been deemed remediated solely by being taken out of service or 12 otherwise rendered inoperable. The plan shall also specify any funding 13 or technical assistance the department intends to provide to school 14 districts to support their efforts to test and remove lead from school 15 water under this section. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 17 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15304-02-6